Massachusetts, session 194th, H1517.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 7A of Chapter 121B, as recently amended by Chapter 235 of the Acts of 2014, is
hereby amended by inserting in the second sentence after the word ‘remuneration’ and before the
word ‘worth’, the following:-
“relevant to state payments”
of 1